Washington statutes.
RCW 4.40.050

Trial of issue of law.

An issue of law shall be tried by the court, unless it is referred as provided by the statutes relating to referees.

[ 1893 c 127 s 32; Code 1881 s 204; 1877 p 42 s 208; 1854 p 164 s 183; RRS s 313.]

NOTES:

Trial before referee: Chapter 4.48 RCW.